Utah statutes.
34A-2-603.   Autopsy in death cases -- Certified pathologist -- Attending physicians -- Penalty for refusal to permit -- Liability.

(1) (a)  On the filing of a claim for compensation for death under this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, when, in the opinion of the commissioner or the commissioner's designee it is necessary to accurately and scientifically ascertain the cause of death, an autopsy may be ordered by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee.

(b)  The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall:

(i)  designate the certified pathologist to make the autopsy; and

(ii)  determine who shall pay the charge of the certified pathologist making the autopsy.

(2)  Any person interested may designate a duly licensed physician to attend the autopsy ordered under Subsection (1).

(3)  The findings of the certified pathologist performing the autopsy shall be filed with the commission.

(4)  All proceedings for compensation shall be suspended upon refusal of a claimant or claimants to permit such autopsy when ordered under Subsection (1).

(5)  When an autopsy has been performed pursuant to an order of the commissioner or the commissioner's designee no cause of action shall lie against any person, firm, or corporation for participating in or requesting the autopsy.

